Utah statutes.
30-1-7.   Marriage licenses -- Use within state -- Expiration.

(1)  No marriage may be solemnized in this state without a license issued by the county clerk of any county of this state.

(2)  A license issued within this state by a county clerk may only be used within this state.

(3)  A license that is not used within 30 days of the date of issuance is void.



Amended by Chapter 289, 2004 General Session

